Illinois, session 104th, HB1714.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Probate Act of 1975 is amended by changing 5Section 11a-5 as follows: 6    (755 ILCS 5/11a-5)  (from Ch. 110 1/2, par. 11a-5)7    Sec. 11a-5. Who may act as guardian. 8    (a) A person is qualified to act as guardian of the person 9and as guardian of the estate of a person with a disability if 10the court finds that the proposed guardian is capable of 11providing an active and suitable program of guardianship for 12the person with a disability and that the proposed guardian:13        (1) has attained the age of 18 years;14        (2) is a resident of the United States;15        (3) is not of unsound mind;16        (4) is not an adjudged person with a disability as 17    defined in this Act; and18        (5) has not been convicted of a felony, unless the 19    court finds appointment of the person convicted of a 20    felony to be in the best interests of the person with a 21    disability, and as part of the best interests 22    determination, the court has considered the nature of the 23    offense, the date of offense, and the evidence of the   HB1714- 2 -LRB104 02917 LNS 12933 b1    proposed guardian's rehabilitation. No person shall be 2    appointed who has been convicted of a felony involving 3    harm or threat to a minor or an elderly person or a person 4    with a disability, including a felony sexual offense; and 5    . 6        (6) has not been found to be an unfit person as defined 7    under subsection D of Section 1 of the Adoption Act, 8    unless the court finds the appointment of the person to 9    have previously been found unfit to be in the best 10    interests of the person with a disability, and as part of 11    the best interests determination, the court has considered 12    the nature of the determination of unfitness, the date of 13    the determination, and the evidence of the proposed 14    guardian's determination. 15    (b) Any public agency, or not-for-profit corporation found 16capable by the court of providing an active and suitable 17program of guardianship for the person with a disability, 18taking into consideration the nature of such person's 19disability and the nature of such organization's services, may 20be appointed guardian of the person or of the estate, or both, 21of the person with a disability. The court shall not appoint as 22guardian an agency or employee of an agency that is directly 23providing residential services to the ward. One person or 24agency may be appointed guardian of the person and another 25person or agency appointed guardian of the estate.26    (b-5)(1) The court may appoint separate individuals or   HB1714- 3 -LRB104 02917 LNS 12933 b1entities to act as the guardian of the person and the guardian 2of the estate of a person with a disability if the court finds 3it is in the best interests of the person with a disability 4that separate guardians be appointed. The court shall not 5appoint a separate person or entity to act as guardian of the 6person or guardian of the estate with a public guardian or the 7Office of State Guardian unless the public guardian or the 8Office of State Guardian agrees to such an appointment.9    (2) The court may appoint co-guardians to act as guardian 10of the person, guardian of the estate, or both the guardian of 11the person and the guardian of the estate if the court finds it 12is in the best interests of the person with a disability. When 13considering appointing co-guardians, the court shall consider 14the proposed co-guardians' history of cooperating and working 15together on behalf of the person with a disability. The court 16shall appoint only co-guardians who agree to serve together. 17The court shall not appoint a public guardian or the Office of 18State Guardian as a co-guardian for a person with a 19disability. 20    (c) Any corporation qualified to accept and execute trusts 21in this State may be appointed guardian or limited guardian of 22the estate of a person with a disability.23(Source: P.A. 102-72, eff. 1-1-22.) 24    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 25becoming law.